Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4897.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 926. (1) For purposes of this article, boiler installer licenses are classified as follows: (a) Class 2B. (b) Class 3B. (c) Class 4B. (d) Class 5B. (e) Class 6B. (f) Class P. (2) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, an individual who has a class 1B license issued by the department is considered to have a class 2B license under this article. Sec. 926a. (1) The director shall not issue a license for a boiler installer described under section 926 unless the applicant meets the requirements that are applicable to the classification of license for which the applicant is seeking licensure, as prescribed by rule. (2) Subject to subsection (3), the department shall promulgate rules to determine the requirements for each boiler installer license classification described in section 926 under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (3) The department shall not issue a class 6B license to an applicant unless the applicant submits evidence of both of the following: (a) Familiarity with and knowledge of federal rules and regulations regarding the installation of boilers that utilize a nuclear heat source. (b) Employment by a company in possession of a valid ASME nuclear code symbol applicable to the portions of any nuclear boiler system the company proposes to install. (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the department may by rule consolidate the licenses described in section 926 to reduce the number of boiler installer licenses issued under this article. Sec. 926b. (1) An individual who is issued a class 2B license under this article may install a low-pressure boiler of any capacity or firing rate. (2) An individual who is issued a class 3B license under this article may do all of the following: (a) Install a power boiler that has a capacity of not more than 5,000 pounds of steam per hour. (b) Install or replace non-boiler external piping. (c) Perform work covered by a class 2B license. (3) An individual who is issued a class 4B license under this article may do all of the following: (a) Install a boiler that has a capacity of not more than 300,000 pounds of steam per hour. (b) Install or replace non-boiler external piping. (c) Perform work covered by a class 3B license. (4) An individual who is issued a class 5B license under this article may do all of the following: (a) Install a boiler of any capacity or firing rate, except for a boiler that utilizes a nuclear heat source. (b) Install or replace non-boiler external piping. (c) Perform work covered by a class 4B license. (5) An individual who is issued a class 6B license under this article may do both of the following: (a) Install a boiler that utilizes a nuclear heat source or the parts, appurtenances, or system components of a boiler that utilizes a nuclear heat source. (b) Perform work covered by a class 5B license. (6) An individual who is issued a class P license under this article may install or replace non-boiler external piping. (7) As used in this section, "non-boiler external piping" means piping, valves, fittings, and appurtenances that are external to a boiler and not part of the boiler proper or boiler external piping, as further defined by the department by rule through adoption of nationally recognized power-piping standards. Sec. 939. A person shall not install or alter a boiler without first obtaining a permit to install or alter the boiler from the boiler division of the department. All of the following apply for purposes of the permit requirement under this section: (a) A person is not eligible for a permit if the person is not licensed under this article.section 926a. (b) An individual shall not perform work for which a permit is required unless he or she the individual is licensed under this article, section 926a, or he or she the individual performs the work under the immediate supervision of an individual who is licensed under this article.section 926a. (c) A person shall obtain a permit by submitting an application to the department and including with the application a permit fee in an amount established by the department under article 4. A permit fee is not required for a boiler that is exempt from inspection under section 915.